Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7138.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-18 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Public Transit
Authority" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-18-25. Creation of parity with MBTA commuter passes.
The authority shall consult with the Massachusetts Bay Transit Authority on the feasibility
of allowing their commuter rail passes to be used on all Rhode Island public transit authority buses.
Both rail passes shall serve as dual Rhode Island public transit authority passes and Massachusetts
Bay Transit Authority passes. The consultation shall also include proposed methods to apportion
and share the costs of the passes between the two (2) authorities.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003778
========